District of Columbia statutes.
31-5601.02

Purpose and coordination with federal law.

(a)

The purpose of this chapter is to protect investors and maintain public confidence in securities markets while avoiding unreasonable burdens on participants in capital markets. This chapter is remedial in nature and is to be broadly construed to effectuate its purposes.

(b)

This chapter and the rules and regulations promulgated hereunder shall be coordinated with the federal acts and statutes to which references are made in this chapter and the rules and regulations promulgated under those federal acts and statutes to the extent that coordination is consistent with both the purposes and the provisions of this chapter.

Oct. 26, 2000, D.C. Law 13-203, § 102, 47 DCR 7837
This section is referenced in § 31-5604.06.